Washington statutes.
RCW 18.260.020

Registration or license required.

(1) No person may practice or represent himself or herself as a registered dental assistant by use of any title or description without being registered by the commission as having met the standards established for registration under this chapter unless he or she is exempt under RCW 18.260.110.

(2) No person may practice or represent himself or herself as a licensed expanded function dental auxiliary by use of any title or description without being licensed by the commission under this chapter unless he or she is exempt under RCW 18.260.110.

[ 2007 c 269 s 2.]